Utah statutes.
26-28-104.   Who may make anatomical gift before donor's death.
Subject to Section 26-28-108, an anatomical gift of a donor's body or part may
be made during the life of the donor for the purpose of transplantation,
therapy, research, or education in the manner provided in Section 26-28-105
by:
(1)  the donor, if the donor is an adult or if the donor is a minor and is:
(a)  emancipated; or
(b)  authorized under state law to apply for a driver license because the
donor is at least 15 years of age;
(2)  an agent of the donor, unless the power of attorney for health care or
other record prohibits the agent from making an anatomical gift;
(3)  a parent of the donor, if the donor is an unemancipated minor; or
(4)  the donor's guardian.
